src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IS_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kíl is - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IS_STEM_1

     kíl is+V+Sg+Impv: kíl is
     kíl is+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: kíl is
     kíl is+V+Rel: kíl iss
     kíl is+V+Interr+Fut+Long: kíl isäsáa
     kíl is+V+Interr+Fut+Short: kíl isäs
     kíl is+V+Simp+Fut: kíl isäsáang
     kíl is+V+Imm+Fut: kíl isäsga
     kíl is+V+Rel+Fut: kíl isäsáas
     kíl is+V+Fut+NonFact: kíl isäsáa.ang
     kíl is+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼúuj
     kíl is+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼúujang
     kíl is+V+Res: kíl isäsáaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: kíl isʼus
     kíl is+V+Bias+Interr+Past: kíl isʼujáa
     kíl is+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼúujaangaa
     kíl is+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: kíl isäsáaʼus
     kíl is+V+Cert+Fut: kíl isäsáaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kíl isäséehl
     kíl is+V+Pl+Impv: kíl isʼúu
     kíl is+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼwáa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼwáa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼwáang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Dir+Past: kíl isʼwägán
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Past: kíl isʼáawaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Indir+Past: kíl isʼáawaan
     kíl is+V+3pl+Rel: kíl isʼwáas
     kíl is+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: kíl isʼáawaas
     kíl is+V+3pl+NonFact: kíl isʼwáa.ang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: kíl isʼáawaa.ang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼwägíinii
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼwägáangaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼwägáangaan
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kíl isʼwáaäsaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kíl isʼwáaäs
     kíl is+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: kíl isʼwáaäsaang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: kíl isʼwáaäsga
     kíl is+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: kíl isʼwáaäsaas
     kíl is+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kíl isʼwáaäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Near+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kíl is+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼwáaʼuuj
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼwáaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Res: kíl isʼwáaäsaaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kíl isʼwáaʼus
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kíl isʼwáaʼujaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼwáaʼuujaangaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kíl isʼwáaäsaaʼus
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: kíl isʼwáaʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cert+Past: kíl isʼwáaʼahlanggan
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kíl isʼwáaʼahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: kíl isʼwáaäsaaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: kíl isʼwáaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+3pl+Ints+Past: kíl isʼáawaaʼahlang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Cont: kíl isʼáawaaʼahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kíl isʼáawaaʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+3pl+Rflx: kíl isʼwáaʼahl
     kíl is+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kíl isʼwáaäseehl
     kíl is+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: kíl isʼáng
     kíl is+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼángga
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼáng
     kíl is+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼánggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Dir+Past: kíl isʼánggan
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Past: kíl isʼáangaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Indir+Past: kíl isʼáangaan
     kíl is+V+Neg+Rel: kíl isʼáns
     kíl is+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: kíl isʼáangaas
     kíl is+V+Neg+NonFact: kíl isʼangáng
     kíl is+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: kíl isʼáangaa.ang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: kíl isʼánggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼánggiinii
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼánggaangaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼánggaangaan
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: kíl isʼángäsaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: kíl isʼángäs
     kíl is+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: kíl isʼángäsaang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: kíl isʼángäsga
     kíl is+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: kíl isʼángäsaas
     kíl is+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: kíl isʼángäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼángʼuuj
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼángʼuujang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Res: kíl isʼángäsaaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: kíl isʼángʼus
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: kíl isʼángʼujaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼuujaangaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: kíl isʼángäsaaʼus
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: kíl isʼáangʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cert+Past: kíl isʼáangʼahlanggan
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: kíl isʼáangʼahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: kíl isʼángäsaaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: kíl isʼáangʼahlans
     kíl is+V+Neg+Ints+Past: kíl isʼáangaaʼahlang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Cont: kíl isʼáangaaʼahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: kíl isʼáangaaʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+Rflx: kíl isʼáangʼahl
     kíl is+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kíl isʼángäseehl
     kíl is+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: kíl isʼángʼuu
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: kíl isʼángʼwägan
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: kíl isʼángʼaawaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: kíl isʼángʼaawaan
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: kíl isʼángʼwaas
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: kíl isʼángʼaawaas
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: kíl isʼángʼwaa.ang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: kíl isʼángʼaawaa.ang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼwägiinii
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼwägaangaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼwägaangaan
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: kíl isʼángʼwaaäs
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsga
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaas
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaa.ang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: kíl isʼwáa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼuuj
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Res: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼus
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼujaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaaʼus
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼahlanggan
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: kíl isʼángʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼahlans
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: kíl isʼángʼaawaaʼahlang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: kíl isʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: kíl isʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: kíl isʼángʼwaaʼahl
     kíl is+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: kíl isʼángʼwaaäseehl
